trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="bost/ad__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aden</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äder</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äderna</l>    <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/ot__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötter</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötterna</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="game__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/us__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öss</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öss</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>össen</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="data__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tors/o__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oer</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oerna</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dus__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="h__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>h</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="viby-i__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sp/ång__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ång</l>       <r>ång<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ången</l>     <r>ång<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ångar</l>     <r>ång<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änger</l>     <r>ång<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ångarna</l>   <r>ång<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ängerna</l>   <r>ång<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ekipage">         <i>ekipage</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="elefantnäbbmus">  <i>elefantnäbbm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="flädermus">       <i>fläderm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="collage">         <i>collage</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="montage">         <i>montage</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="torso">           <i>tors</i><par n="tors/o__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="linslus">         <i>linsl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mjukdata">        <i>mjukdata</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="eremitage">       <i>eremitage</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="elementa">        <i>elementa</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="teledata">        <i>teledata</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="karakteristika">  <i>karakteristika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="h">               <i>h</i><par n="h__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="servgame">        <i>servgame</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="granbarrlus">     <i>granbarrl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="analgetika">      <i>analgetika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="bladlus">         <i>bladl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="prestanda">       <i>prestanda</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="geodata">         <i>geodata</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="pretiosa">        <i>pretiosa</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="spång">           <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ång__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="syraläckage">     <i>syraläckage</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="antecedentia">    <i>antecedentia</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="hårddata">        <i>hårddata</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="game">            <i>game</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hasselmus">       <i>hasselm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lus">             <i>l</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sköldlus">        <i>sköldl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="neuroleptika">    <i>neuroleptika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="kollage">         <i>kollage</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="servegame">       <i>servegame</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="läckage">         <i>läckage</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="buskage">         <i>buskage</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="varufakta">       <i>varufakta</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="apanage">         <i>apanage</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="vägglus">         <i>väggl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="flatlus">         <i>flatl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fladdermus">      <i>fladderm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="farmaka">         <i>farmaka</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="college">         <i>college</i><par n="game__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="viby-i">          <i>viby-i</i><par n="viby-i__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dus">             <i>dus</i><par n="dus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vinlus">          <i>vinl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ullus">           <i>ull</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="åretruntbostad">  <i>åretruntbost</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vinterbostad">    <i>vinterbost</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="servicebostad">   <i>servicebost</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sommarbostad">    <i>sommarbost</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="världsstad">      <i>världsst</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="småstad">         <i>småst</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tjänstebostad">   <i>tjänstebost</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="spökstad">        <i>spökst</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stapelstad">      <i>stapelst</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gräsrot">         <i>gräsr</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tassfot">         <i>tassf</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hamnstad">        <i>hamnst</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lampfot">         <i>lampf</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="morot">           <i>mor</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gödselstad">      <i>gödselst</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="möbelfot">        <i>möbelf</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ordfot">          <i>ordf</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="framfot">         <i>framf</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="eldstad">         <i>eldst</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ålandsrot">       <i>ålandsr</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="knölrot">         <i>knölr</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kålrot">          <i>kålr</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="julgransfot">     <i>julgransf</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="näsrot">          <i>näsr</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bilverkstad">     <i>bilverkst</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gångfot">         <i>gångf</i><par n="f/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lärdomsstad">     <i>lärdomsst</i><par n="bost/ad__n_ut"/></e>
